District of Columbia statutes.
38-1853.06

Priorities.

In awarding grants under § 38-1853.04(a), the Secretary shall give priority to applications from eligible entities that will most effectively—

(1)

in awarding scholarships under § 38-1853.07(a), give priority to—

(A)

eligible students who, in the school year preceding the school year for which the eligible students are seeking a scholarship, attended an elementary school or secondary school implementing comprehensive support and improvement activities or targeted support and improvement activities under section 1111(d) [20 U.S.C. § 6311(d)] of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;

(B)

students who have been awarded a scholarship in a preceding year under this chapter or the DC School Choice Incentive Act of 2003 (§ 38-1851.01 et seq., D.C. Official Code), as such Act was in effect on the day before the date of the enactment of this chapter, but who have not used the scholarship, including eligible students who were provided notification of selection for a scholarship for school year 2009-2010, which was later rescinded in accordance with direction from the Secretary of Education; and

(C)

students whose household includes a sibling or other child who is already participating in the program of the eligible entity under this chapter, regardless of whether such students have, in the past, been assigned as members of a control study group for the purposes of an evaluation under § 38-1853.09(a);

(2)

target resources to students and families that lack the financial resources to take advantage of available educational options; and

(3)

provide students and families with the widest range of educational options.

History

Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 202, Pub. L. 112-10, Div. C, § 3006
Dec. 10, 2015, 129 Stat. 1802, Pub. L. 114-95, § 9215(ppp)(2)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1853.05 and § 38-1853.09.

Effect of Amendments

Section 9215(ppp)(2) of Public Law 114-95 substituted “implementing comprehensive support and improvement activities or targeted support and improvement activities under section 1111(d) of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965” for “identified for improvement, corrective action, or restructuring under section 1116 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6316)” in (1)(A).